Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1604
Private, denominational, or parochial schools; management and control.

For the purposes of sections 79-1601 to 79-1607, the owner or governing board of any private, denominational, or parochial school shall have authority to select and purchase textbooks, equipment, and supplies, to employ teachers, and to have and exercise the general management of the school, subject to the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 4, p. 349;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(k), p. 230;

C.S.1922, § 6508i;

C.S.1929, § 79-1909;

R.S.1943, § 79-1916;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 509, p. 864;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1704;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1007.

Textbook loan program, see section 79-734.